Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
GENERAL CORPORATE POWERS

11-103-101. General corporate powers.

A state bank may be organized to exercise the powers provided in this code.

Subject to the provisions of section 11-103-102, a state bank organized under the laws of this state shall, without specific mention thereof in its charter, have all the powers conferred by this code and the following additional general corporate powers:

To continue perpetually as a corporation;

To make contracts;

To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name;

To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at pleasure, and to use the same by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed, or in any manner reproduced;

To make, alter, amend, and repeal bylaws, not inconsistent with its charter or with law, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation;

To elect, appoint, or remove officers and agents of the bank and to define their duties and fix their compensation;

To adopt and operate reasonable bonus, profit-sharing, and pension plans for officers and employees;

To grant, subject to approval of the banking board, and by vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock voted at a meeting of the stockholders, options to purchase, sell, or enter into agreements to sell shares of its capital stock to its employees, whether or not such transactions qualify for special tax treatment under the "Internal Revenue Code", as amended, and rules promulgated thereunder.

A state bank, organized under the laws of this state, if so provided in its charter, has the general corporate power to eliminate or limit the personal liability of a director to the corporation or to its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director; except that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director to the corporation or to its shareholders for monetary damages for: Any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the corporation or its stockholders, acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law, or any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit. No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director to the corporation or to its shareholders for monetary damages for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

A state bank, organized under the laws of this state, without specific mention in its charter, shall also have the power, in addition to all other powers, to make contributions to, or for the use or benefit of, the following:

The United States, any state, territory, or political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, or any possession of the United States for exclusively public purposes;

A corporation, foundation, trust, community chest, or other organization created or organized in the United States, or in any state or territory, or the District of Columbia, or any possession of the United States, and organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, veteran rehabilitation service, civic enterprise, or literary or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and no substantial part of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence legislation; or

Other lawful expenditures, contributions, and donations to the extent authorized, approved, or ratified by action of the board of directors of the corporation, except as otherwise specifically provided or limited by its articles of incorporation, its bylaws, or resolution duly adopted by its stockholders.

A state bank organized under the laws of this state, without specific mention in its charter, shall also have the power to act as escrow agent.

If the name of a state bank organized under the laws of this state contains the word "bank", said bank need not comply with the requirements of part 6 of article 90 of title 7, C.R.S.

No state bank shall commit itself, either directly or indirectly, to undertake the responsibility for the tax liability of its shareholders or members.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1080, § 3, effective July 1; (7) added, p. 1747, § 3, effective July 1.

11-103-102. Trust, fiduciary, and agency powers - when authorized.

In addition to its other powers, a state bank that is authorized by its charter to exercise trust powers, upon proper qualification under this code, has the power to act as a fiduciary in any capacity. It may also act as registrar, transfer agent, fiscal agent, or attorney-in-fact and have the power to receive, manage, and apply sinking funds. Every state bank that is authorized by its charter to exercise trust powers pursuant to this section shall make and file with the commissioner an annual report of trust assets and such other reports as the banking board may require by rule, on such forms as may be prescribed by the banking board. No report filed pursuant to this section shall be required to be published.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1081, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-103. State bank organized as a limited liability company.

Pursuant to section 11-102-104 (5.5)(a), a state bank charter may be issued to a limited liability company that otherwise meets the requirements of this code.

A state bank organized as a limited liability company shall not be required to exist in perpetuity; except that the articles of organization of such a state bank shall provide for a method to extend the existence of the state bank in the event that termination occurs. In addition, the articles of organization of such a state bank shall require that liquidation of the limited liability company conform with the requirements of this code.

Upon approval of the banking board, a state bank organized as a limited liability company may be merged with or converted into another entity regardless of the form of the surviving entity, so long as the surviving entity satisfies the requirements of this code.

Upon approval of the banking board, a state bank organized as a corporation may be merged with or converted into a limited liability company, so long as it satisfies the requirements of this code.

A state bank organized as a limited liability company shall have a written operating agreement containing any provisions for the affairs of the bank and the conduct of its business as may be agreed upon by the members and which provisions are consistent with this code and the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S.

A copy of the written operating agreement shall be filed with the banking board prior to the granting of a charter to the state bank, and any amendments to the operating agreement shall be filed with and approved by the banking board prior to adoption.

The banking board may promulgate rules establishing additional requirements relating to operating agreements to implement the provisions of this section.

All distributions made by a state bank organized as a limited liability company to its members shall be subject to the requirements applicable to dividends issued by a state bank organized as a corporation under this code and the rules of the banking board.

For purposes of implementing this section, the following definition constructions shall apply:

Where this code refers to "articles of incorporation", that term shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's articles of organization, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102 (1), C.R.S.;

Where this code refers to "bylaws", that term shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's operating agreement, as that term is defined in section 7-80-102 (11), C.R.S.;

Where this code refers to "common stock" or "shares" of a state bank, such terms shall be construed to apply to a limited liability company's membership interests;

Where this code refers to a "corporation", such term shall be construed to include a limited liability company organized under the "Colorado Limited Liability Company Act", article 80 of title 7, C.R.S., which limited liability company conforms to this section and the requirements established by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (5.5);

Where this code refers to a "director" or a "board of directors" of a state bank, such terms shall be construed to apply to a manager or the managers of a limited liability company;

Where this code refers to an "incorporator", such term shall be construed to apply to the organizers of a limited liability company;

Where this code refers to a "shareholder" or a "stockholder" of a state bank, such terms shall be construed to apply to a member of a limited liability company.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1746, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 11-3-101.5 as enacted by House Bill 03-1106 was harmonized with House Bill 03-1257 and relocated as § 11-103-103.